Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Chapter 5

Presumptions

24-5-101. Conveyances of public officers and fiduciaries.

All instruments of conveyance executed in official capacity by any public officer of this state or by any person occupying a position of trust or acting in a fiduciary relation shall be admitted, held, and construed by the courts as prima facie evidence of the facts in such instruments recited, insofar as such facts relate to the execution of the power of such office or trust. All such instruments now of record shall be admitted, held, and construed in accordance with this section.

Acts 1907, ch. 334, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 5572a2, 5572a3; Code 1932, §§ 9745, 9746; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-503.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 55.

24-5-102. Settlements of personal representatives and guardians.

The settlements of personal representatives and guardians, made in the county court in pursuance of law, are to be taken as prima facie correct.

Code 1858, § 3786 (deriv. Acts 1822, ch. 31, § 2; 1837-1838, ch. 125, § 5); Shan., § 5567; Code 1932, § 9738; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-504.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 410.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 846.

24-5-103. Notary's certificate as to notice of dishonor.

The certificate of a notary public in or on the notary's protest, that such notary public has given the parties to negotiable paper notice of the dishonor, is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the certificate; and, in like manner, entries in such notary public's books to the same effect are prima facie evidence, in case of the notary's death, of the facts therein stated.

Code 1858, § 3787 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 49, § 2; 1820, ch. 25, § 4; 1835-1836, ch. 11, § 5); Shan., § 5568; Code 1932, § 9739; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-505.

24-5-104. [Reserved.]

The execution or assignment of instruments offered in evidence by the defendant, when allowed by law, is equally conclusive as when introduced by plaintiff, unless denied under oath.

Code 1858, § 3779 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 27, § 4); Shan., § 5558; Code 1932, § 9728; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-507.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 166.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 27.

24-5-106. Denial of instrument by successor of decedent.

If the party be deceased, the personal representative, or in case such representative refuses or fails to do so, any heir of the deceased, or other person, who is entitled to any part of the estate, either by will or by law, and who is or becomes a party to the suit, may make the denial under oath “according to the best of my personal knowledge, information and belief.”

Code 1858, § 3778 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 42, § 1); Acts 1905, ch. 73; Shan., § 5557; mod. Code 1932, § 9727; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-508.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 166.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 742.

24-5-107. Sworn accounts.

An account on which action is brought, coming from another state or another county of this state, or from the county where suit is brought, with the affidavit of the plaintiff or its agent to its correctness, and the certificate of a state commissioner annexed thereto, or the certificate of a notary public with such notary public's official seal annexed thereto, or the certificate of a judge of the court of general sessions, with the certificate of the county clerk that such judge is an acting judge within the county, is conclusive against the party sought to be charged, unless that party on oath denies the account or except as allowed under subsection (b).

The court shall allow the defendant orally to deny the account under oath and assert any defense or objection the defendant may have. Upon such denial, on the plaintiff's motion, or in the interest of justice, the judge shall continue the action to a date certain for trial.

Code 1858, § 3780 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 25, § 1); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 30, § 3; 1879, ch. 40, § 1; 1903, ch. 33, § 1; Shan., § 5561; Code 1932, § 9732; Acts 1957, ch. 68, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-509; Acts 1995, ch. 519, § 1.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 166, 503.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Accounts and Accounting, § 14; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

24-5-108. Partnership of plaintiffs.

Whenever two (2) or more persons bring a suit at law, or in equity, as partners upon an account, bill of exchange, bond, or note, either before a magistrate or a court of record, it shall not be necessary for them to prove their partnership, unless the defendant files a plea in abatement, in writing, denying the partnership on oath.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 104, § 4; Shan., § 5559; mod. Code 1932, § 9729; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-510.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 166.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 52.

24-5-109. Partnership of defendants.

Where two (2) or more persons are sued as partners, in law or equity, it shall not be necessary to prove the partnership unless the fact of partnership be denied under oath of those so sued.

Code 1932, § 9730; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-511.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, § 52.

24-5-110. Determinations of status by federal officers.

A written finding of presumed death made by the secretary of war, the secretary of the navy, or other officer or employee of the United States authorized to make such finding, pursuant to the Federal Missing Persons Act (Acts Mar. 7, 1942, ch. 166, 56 Stat. 143; Dec. 24, 1942, ch. 828, 56 Stat. 1092; July 1, 1944, ch. 371, 58 Stat. 679; Feb. 12, 1946, ch. 6, 60 Stat. 5; May 16, 1947, ch. 70, 61 Stat. 96; Aug. 29, 1951, ch. 356, 65 Stat. 207; July 3, 1952, ch. 570, 66 Stat. 331; Apr. 4, 1953, ch. 17, 67 Stat. 20; 50 U.S.C. Appx. §§ 1001-1015) as now or hereafter amended, or a duly certified copy of such finding, shall be received in any court, office or other place in this state as prima facie evidence of the death of the person therein found to be dead, and the date, circumstances and place of such person's disappearance.

An official written report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, that a person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, made by an officer or employee of the United States authorized by the act referred to in subsection (a) or by any other law of the United States to make same, shall be received in any court, office or other place in this state as prima facie evidence that such person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, as the case may be.

For the purposes of subsections (a) and (b), any finding, report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, purporting to have been signed by such an officer or employee of the United States as is described in those subsections, shall prima facie be deemed to have been signed and issued by such an officer or employee pursuant to law, and the person signing same shall prima facie be deemed to have acted within the scope of such person's authority.

If a copy purports to have been certified by a person authorized by law to certify the same, such certified copy shall be prima facie evidence of such person's authority to so certify.

Acts 1945, ch. 14, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 9773.1-9773.3 (Williams, §§ 9773.8-9773.10); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 24-512 — 24-514; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The Missing Persons Act referred to in this section is compiled in 5 U.S.C. §§ 5561-5568 and 37 U.S.C. §§ 551-558.

24-5-111. Negligence of bailee.

In all actions by a bailor against a bailee for loss or damage to personal property, proof by the bailor that the property was delivered to the bailee in good condition and that it was not returned or redelivered according to the contract, or that it was returned or redelivered in a damaged condition, shall constitute prima facie evidence that the bailee was negligent, provided the loss or damage was not due to the inherent nature of the property bailed.

C. Supp. 1950, § 9746.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-515.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bailments, § 15; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 40.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1197.

The Liability of Garagemen for Defective Repairs of Motor Vehicles (Danny T. Ferguson), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 131.

Torts — 1960 Tennessee Survey (John H. Wade), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1269.

24-5-112. Continuance of reproductive capacity — Rebuttable presumption.

The present absolute common law presumption which prevails in Tennessee that men and women are presumed capable of having children as long as they live shall be only a prima facie presumption and rebuttable by competent evidence.

Acts 1965, ch. 54, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-516.

24-5-113. Medical, hospital or doctor bills — Prima facie evidence of necessity and reasonableness.

Proof in any civil action that medical, hospital or doctor bills were paid or incurred because of any illness, disease, or injury may be itemized in the complaint or civil warrant with a copy of bills paid or incurred attached as an exhibit to the complaint or civil warrant. The bills itemized and attached as an exhibit shall be prima facie evidence that the bills so paid or incurred were necessary and reasonable.

This section shall apply only in personal injury actions brought in any court by injured parties against the persons responsible for causing such injuries.

This prima facie presumption shall apply to the medical, hospital and doctor bills itemized with copies of bills attached to the complaint or civil warrant; provided, that the total amount of such bills does not exceed the sum of four thousand dollars ($4,000).

In addition to the procedure described in subsection (a), in any civil action for personal injury brought by an injured party against the person or persons alleged to be responsible for causing the injury, if an itemization of or copies of the medical, hospital or doctor bills which were paid or incurred because of such personal injury are served upon the other parties at least ninety (90) days prior to the date set for trial, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that such medical, hospital or doctor bills are reasonable.

Any party desiring to offer evidence at trial to rebut the presumption shall serve upon the other parties, at least forty-five (45) days prior to the date set for trial, a statement of that party's intention to rebut the presumption. Such statement shall specify which bill or bills the party believes to be unreasonable.

Acts 1978, ch. 734, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-517; Acts 1981, ch. 481, § 1; 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 2000, ch. 780, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-9.07-1.

Law Reviews.

Alternative Dispute Resolution in the Personal Injury Forum (William P. Zdancewicz), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1169 (1996).

Workers' Compensation Outline (Paul Campbell III), 18 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1982).

24-5-114. Repair bills.

Proof that bills were incurred and paid to repair real or personal property shall create a rebuttable presumption of the reasonableness of the amount paid and the necessity for the repairs in any civil action seeking damages for injury to, or improper repair, of the property.

This presumption shall not extend to any payments which exceed the sum total of one thousand dollars ($1,000). The plaintiff may select those payments, not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), for which the plaintiff wishes to claim the benefit of the presumption.

Proof of such payments shall be itemized in the civil warrant or complaint at the time suit is filed by attaching a list showing payments, amounts, person paid, goods or services for which payment was made and a copy of any invoice, bill or receipt. Failure to attach the invoice, bill, or receipt may be excused, in the court's discretion, if none was rendered, it was lost and cannot be found after diligent search or it has been inadvertently destroyed.

In no event may the presumption created by this section be permitted, over objection, by an amendment to the civil warrant or complaint within thirty (30) days of the trial.

At the trial of the cause, any such payments may be introduced into evidence as though there had been competent testimony as to their reasonableness in amount and necessity, but shall constitute no proof of any wrongdoing by the defendant.

Acts 1984, ch. 621, § 1.

24-5-115. Default judgments in subrogation actions brought by an automobile insurance carrier.

In a subrogation action brought in general sessions court by an automobile insurance carrier for recovery of amounts paid to or on behalf of its insured under the collision, comprehensive, medical payments or uninsured motorist coverages of a contract of automobile insurance, the affidavit of the plaintiff-carrier or its agent as to the total damages paid, or incurred, including the insured's deductible, is presumptive evidence against the alleged tortfeasor from whom recovery is sought, except as provided under subsection (b); provided, that such affidavit is accompanied by a certificate of a notary public with seal annexed, or certificate of a judge of the court of general sessions, with the certificate of the county clerk that such judge is an acting judge within the county.

The presumption afforded in subsection (a) shall not be conclusive to the extent that the alleged tortfeasor from whom recovery is sought denies tort liability for the incident, or denies the extent of the damages alleged to be related to the incident, or both. Any such denial must be under oath in writing, or made orally in open court, and the alleged tortfeasor shall be allowed to assert any defense or objection the defendant may have. Such affidavit shall be served upon the alleged tortfeasor with the civil warrant. Upon such denial, on the plaintiff-carrier's motion, or in the interest of justice, the judge shall continue the action to a date certain for trial.

This section does not apply if the automobile insurance carrier files an intervening complaint in an existing action brought by an injured person against the alleged tortfeasor.

This section does not affect the viability of the made-whole doctrine in Tennessee.

Acts 2005, ch. 22, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 22, § 2 provided that the act shall apply to all causes of action arising on or after July 1, 2005.

24-5-105. Instruments offered by defendant.